Missouri, session 2026, SB1064.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 407.932, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 407.932,
to read as follows:
407.932. [Nothing in sections 407.925 to 407.932 shall
prohibit local political subdivisions from enacting more
stringent ordinances or rules.] 1. The state preempts the
field of regulating the sale of tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, and vapor products,
including, but not limited to, local ordinances dealing with
ingredients, setting the age to sell or purchase over twenty-
one years of age, licensing bans, and product bans. The
provisions of sections 407.924 to 407.934 shall supersede
any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules, or regulations
enacted by a county, municipality, or other political
subdivision to regulate the sale of tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.
2. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to prohibit counties, municipalities, or other
political subdivisions from enforcing ordinances or
regulations that set the age to sell or purchase tobacco
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1064 2
products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products
to persons under twenty-one years of age.
3. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to preempt any local laws, ordinances, orders,
rules, or regulations relating to tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products that are
enacted by a county, municipality, or other political
subdivision and that are in effect as of January 1, 2026.
Any such local law, ordinance, order, rule, or regulation
that is enacted or amended after January 1, 2026, shall be
subject to the provisions of this section.
✓